Utah statutes.
75-7-109.   Methods and waiver of notice.

(1)  Notice to a person under this chapter or the sending of a document to a person under this chapter must be accomplished in a manner reasonably suitable under the circumstances and likely to result in receipt of the notice or document.  Permissible methods of notice or for sending a document include first-class mail, personal delivery, delivery to the person's last known place of residence or place of business, or a properly directed electronic message.

(2)  Notice under this chapter or the sending of a document under this chapter may be waived by the person to be notified or sent the document.

(3)  Notice of a judicial proceeding must be given as provided in the applicable rules of civil procedure.



Enacted by Chapter 89, 2004 General Session

